Washington statutes.
RCW 15.09.140

Abolishment of board.

Upon receipt of a petition signed by twenty-five landowners within the county or on its own motion, the board of county commissioners may abolish the pest and disease board following a hearing and a finding that the purposes of this chapter would not be sufficiently served by the continued existence of such board.

[ 1969 c 113 s 14.]